Utah statutes.
63J-4-602.   Public Lands Policy Coordinating Office -- Coordinator -- Appointment -- Qualifications -- Compensation.

(1)  There is created within state government the Public Lands Policy Coordinating Office.  The office shall be administered by a public lands policy coordinator.

(2)  The coordinator shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.

(3)  The coordinator shall have demonstrated the necessary administrative and professional ability through education and experience to efficiently and effectively manage the office's affairs.

(4)  The coordinator and employees of the office shall receive compensation as provided in Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.

